Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB149.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 164.740 TO 164.7891 IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) To ensure the availability of paramedics in the coal-producing counties of the
Commonwealth, the General Assembly hereby establishes the Coal County
Paramedic Scholarship Program to provide eligible Kentucky students the
opportunity to attend a participating postsecondary institution and to become
licensed paramedics in the Commonwealth, provided that the scholarship
recipient agrees to practice as a paramedic in a coal-producing county for four
(4) years upon program completion.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) "Coal-producing county" has the same meaning as in KRS 42.4592;
(b) "Eligible program of study" means a paramedic program approved by the
authority and offered by a participating institution accredited by the
Commission on Accreditation of Allied Health Education Programs; and
(c) "Qualified service" means full-time employment in a coal-producing county
of the Commonwealth of Kentucky as a licensed paramedic for a majority of
the calendar year.
(3) The authority may award scholarships, to the extent funds are available for that
purpose, to any person who:
(a) Is a Kentucky resident;
(b) Is considered a permanent resident of a coal-producing county for at least
one (1) year immediately preceding July 1 of the academic year in which the
scholarship is made;
(c) Is a United States citizen as determined by the participating institution in
accordance with criteria established by the Council on Postsecondary
Page 1 of 5
XXXX 1/2/2025 2:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 823
Education for the purposes of admission and tuition assessment;
(d) Is enrolled or accepted for enrollment in an eligible program of study at a
participating institution on a full-time basis;
(e) Agrees to render four (4) years of qualified service in a coal-producing
county of the Commonwealth upon program completion; and
(f) Agrees to sign a promissory note as evidence of the scholarship awarded
and the obligation to repay the scholarship amount or render paramedic
service as agreed in lieu of payment.
(4) (a) Notwithstanding KRS 164.753(3), the amount of the scholarship awarded
under subsection (3) of this section shall not exceed one hundred percent
(100%) of the in-state tuition and fees required for participation in the
eligible program of study at a participating institution. The authority shall
establish, by administrative regulation promulgated in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A, a procedure for awarding scholarships should funding be
insufficient to award scholarships to all eligible students. The authority may
also, by administrative regulation, establish scholarship amounts based on
demonstration of initial financial need by eligible students.
(b) The actual amount of the scholarship awarded to each eligible student by
the authority for each semester shall be based on the amount of funds
available and the criteria established under paragraph (a) of this
subsection.
(5) (a) The authority shall require each student receiving a scholarship under this
section to execute a promissory note as evidence of the obligation.
(b) The recipient shall render four (4) years of qualified service in a coal-
producing county upon completion of a paramedic program. Upon
completion of four (4) years of qualified service in a coal-producing county,
the authority shall cancel all promissory notes.
Page 2 of 5
XXXX 1/2/2025 2:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 823
(c) If a recipient fails to complete an eligible program of study, or fails to
render service as a paramedic as agreed in this subsection, the recipient
shall be liable for the total repayment of the sum of all outstanding
promissory notes and accrued interest.
(6) Any person who is in default on any obligation to the authority under any
program administered by the authority under KRS 164.740 to 164.785 shall not
be awarded a scholarship under this section, or have a promissory note canceled,
until all financial obligations to the authority are satisfied, except that
ineligibility for this reason may be waived by the authority for cause.
(7) A repayment obligation imposed by this section shall not be voidable by reason of
the age of the recipient at the time of executing the promissory note.
(8) Failure to meet repayment obligations imposed by this section shall be cause for
the revocation of the scholarship recipient's paramedic license, subject to the
procedures set forth in KRS Chapter 311A.
(9) Notwithstanding KRS 164.753(3), the authority shall establish by administrative
regulation procedures for the administration of this program, including but not
limited to the execution of appropriate contracts and promissory notes,
cancellation of obligations, the rate of repayment, and deferment of repayment of
outstanding debt.
(10) Notwithstanding any other statute to the contrary, the maximum interest rate
applicable to repayment of a promissory note under this section shall be twelve
percent (12%) per annum, except that if a judgment is rendered to recover
payment, the judgment shall bear interest at the rate of five percent (5%) greater
than the rate actually charged on the promissory note.
(11) (a) There is hereby established in the State Treasury a trust and agency
account to be known as the coal county paramedic scholarship fund.
(b) The fund shall consist of amounts transferred from coal severance tax
Page 3 of 5
XXXX 1/2/2025 2:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 823
receipts as provided in paragraph (e) of this subsection, state
appropriations, gifts, grants, and federal funds.
(c) The fund shall be administered by the authority.
(d) Amounts deposited in the fund shall be used for providing scholarships to
qualifying students studying to be a paramedic in schools in the
Commonwealth and for no other purpose.
(e) 1. Beginning July 1, 2026, receipts from the coal severance tax levied
under KRS 143.020 shall be transferred to the fund on an annual
basis in an amount not to exceed the lesser of:
a. One percent (1%) of the total annual coal severance tax
revenues collected under KRS 143.020; or
b. The amount necessary to provide full funding for all students
who qualify for a scholarship under this section, considering all
other resources available.
2. Transfers required by subparagraph 1. of this paragraph shall be
made as follows:
a. On or before August 1 of each year, sixty-five percent (65%) of
the amount of funding provided for in this paragraph shall be
transferred to the fund; and
b. The remaining thirty-five percent (35%) shall be transferred on
or before December 1 of each year.
3. a. The amount transferred shall be based upon the prevailing
revenue estimate for coal severance tax receipts at the time each
transfer is made.
b. If the amount of actual coal severance tax receipts is less than
the prevailing revenue estimate for the year, the next August 1
payment shall be reduced by the difference between the two (2)
Page 4 of 5
XXXX 1/2/2025 2:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 823
amounts.
c. No additional funds shall be transferred if the actual coal
severance tax receipts exceed the prevailing revenue estimate.
(f) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any fund balance at the close of the fiscal
year shall not lapse but shall be transferred to the local government
economic assistance fund established in KRS 42.450 within ninety (90) days
of the end of the fiscal year.
(g) All moneys repaid to the authority under this section shall be added to the
fund.
Page 5 of 5
XXXX 1/2/2025 2:30 PM Jacketed